Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.225

Articles of merger or consolidation.

(1) Upon approval, articles of merger or articles of consolidation shall be executed by each corporation, by an officer of each corporation, and shall set forth:

(a) The plan of merger or the plan of consolidation;

(b) A statement setting forth the date of the meeting of members or shareholders at which the plan was adopted, that a quorum was present at such meeting, and that such plan received at least two-thirds of the votes which members and shareholders of the corporation and of each class entitled to vote thereon as a class, present at such meeting in person or by mail or by electronic transmission or represented by proxy were entitled to cast, or a statement that such amendment was adopted by a consent in writing signed by all members.

(2) The articles of merger or articles of consolidation shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing in accordance with Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4113; 2000 c 167 s 9; 1982 c 35 s 134; 1981 c 302 s 8; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 45.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.